Maryland, session 2025, HB0387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–447.1.
(p) (2) There is a Coordinated Community Supports Partnership Fund.
(6) The Fund consists of:
(i) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;

HOUSE BILL 387 3
(ii) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 2–4B–02 OF
THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(III) Interest earnings; and
[(iii)] (IV) Any other money from any other source accepted for the
benefit of the Fund.
Article – Health – General
19–130.
(b) (1) There is a Maryland Trauma Physician Services Fund.
(c) The Fund consists of:
(1) Motor vehicle registration surcharges paid into the Fund in accordance
with § 13–954(b)(2) of the Transportation Article;
(2) At least 20% of the fines collected under § 21–902(a)(1), (b)(2), (c)(2),
and (d)(1) of the Transportation Article; [and]
(3) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 2–4B–02 OF THE
TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE; AND
(4) Any other money transferred from the General Fund of the State.
Article – Public Safety
4–902.
(a) There is a Maryland Violence Intervention and Prevention Program Fund.
(e) (1) The Fund consists of:
(i) money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(ii) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 2–4B–02 OF
THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(III) investment earnings of the Fund; and
[(iii)] (IV) money from any other source accepted for the benefit of
the Fund.

HOUSE BILL 387
5–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) (1) “Firearm” means:
(i) a weapon that expels, is designed to expel, or may readily be
converted to expel a projectile by the action of an explosive;
(ii) the frame or receiver of such a weapon; or
(iii) an unfinished frame or receiver, as defined in § 5–701 of this title.
(2) “Firearm” includes a starter gun.
Article – Tax – General
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(H–1) “FIREARM EXCISE TAX” MEANS THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER TITLE 7.7 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
2–102.
(a) In addition to the duties set forth elsewhere in this article and in other articles
of the Code, the Comptroller shall administer the laws that relate to:
(1) the admissions and amusement tax;
(2) the boxing and wrestling tax;
(3) the digital advertising gross revenues tax;
(4) THE FIREARM EXCISE TAX;
(5) the income tax;
[(5)] (6) the Maryland estate tax;
[(6)] (7) the Maryland generation–skipping transfer tax;
[(7)] (8) the motor carrier tax;
[(8)] (9) the motor fuel tax;

HOUSE BILL 387 5
[(9)] (10) the sales and use tax; and
[(10)] (11) the savings and loan association franchise tax.
SUBTITLE 4B. FIREARM EXCISE TAX REVENUE DISTRIBUTION.
2–4B–01.
FROM THE FIREARM EXCISE TAX REVENUE, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL
DISTRIBUTE THE AMOUNT NECESSARY TO ADMINISTER THE FIREARM EXCISE TAX
LAWS TO AN ADMINISTRATIVE COST ACCOUNT.
2–4B–02.
(A) AFTER MAKING THE DISTRIBUTION REQUIRED UNDER § 2–4B–01 OF
THIS SUBTITLE, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE REMAINING FIREARM
EXCISE TAX REVENUE EQUALLY AMONG THE FOLLOWING:
(1) THE COORDINATED COMMUNITY SUPPORTS PARTNERSHIP FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–447.1 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE;
(2) THE MARYLAND TRAUMA PHYSICIAN SERVICES FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 19–130 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(3) THE R ADAMS COWLEY SHOCK TRAUMA CENTER AT THE
UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND MEDICAL SYSTEM;
(4) THE MARYLAND VIOLENCE INTERVENTION AND PREVENTION
PROGRAM FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 4–902 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE;
(5) THE SURVIVORS OF HOMICIDE VICTIMS GRANT PROGRAM
WITHIN THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF CRIME PREVENTION AND POLICY; AND
(6) THE CENTER FOR FIREARM VIOLENCE PREVENTION AND
INTERVENTION WITHIN THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH.
(B) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT THE REVENUE
DISTRIBUTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SUPPLEMENT, AND NOT
SUPPLANT, ANY OTHER FUNDING REQUIRED BY LAW.
TITLE 7.7. FIREARM EXCISE TAX.
SUBTITLE 1. DEFINITIONS; GENERAL PROVISIONS.

HOUSE BILL 387
7.7–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER” MEANS A PERSON
LICENSED BY THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF ALCOHOL, TOBACCO, FIREARMS AND
EXPLOSIVES TO DEAL IN FIREARMS.
(C) “FIREARM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–101 OF THE PUBLIC
SAFETY ARTICLE.
(D) (1) “GROSS RECEIPTS” MEANS THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE SALE OR
LEASE OR RENTAL PRICE OF THE RETAIL SALE BY A PERSON, VALUED IN MONEY,
WHETHER RECEIVED IN MONEY OR OTHERWISE, WITHOUT ANY DEDUCTION FOR:
(I) THE COST OF THE PROPERTY SOLD;
(II) THE COST OF THE MATERIALS USED, LABOR OR SERVICE
COST, INTEREST PAID, LOSSES, OR ANY OTHER EXPENSE; OR
(III) THE COST OF TRANSPORTATION OF THE PROPERTY.
(2) “GROSS RECEIPTS” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) CASH DISCOUNTS ALLOWED AND TAKEN ON SALES;
(II) THE SALE PRICE OF PROPERTY RETURNED BY CUSTOMERS
WHEN THAT AMOUNT IS REFUNDED IN CASH OR CREDIT UNLESS THE CUSTOMER, IN
ORDER TO OBTAIN THE REFUND, IS REQUIRED TO PURCHASE OTHER PROPERTY AT
A PRICE GREATER THAN THE AMOUNT CHARGED FOR THE PROPERTY THAT IS
RETURNED;
(III) THE PRICE RECEIVED FOR LABOR OR SERVICES USED IN
INSTALLING OR APPLYING THE PROPERTY SOLD; AND
(IV) THE AMOUNT OF ANY TAX IMPOSED BY THE UNITED STATES,
THE STATE, A COUNTY, OR A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION ON OR WITH RESPECT TO
RETAIL SALES WHETHER IMPOSED ON THE PERSON OR THE CONSUMER.
(E) “LARGE RETAILER” MEANS A BUSINESS WHOSE RETAIL FACILITY HAS A
FOOTPRINT OF AT LEAST 20,000 SQUARE FEET.

HOUSE BILL 387 7
(F) “LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY” MEANS:
(1) A STATE, COUNTY, OR MUNICIPAL POLICE DEPARTMENT OR
AGENCY;
(2) A SHERIFF’S OFFICE; OR
(3) A FEDERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY.
(G) “LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IN AN
OFFICIAL CAPACITY IS AUTHORIZED BY STATE OR FEDERAL LAW TO MAKE ARRESTS
AND REQUIRED, AS PART OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S EMPLOYMENT, TO CARRY A
FIREARM.
(H) “RETAIL SALE” MEANS A SALE FOR A PURPOSE OTHER THAN RESALE IN
THE REGULAR COURSE OF BUSINESS.
7.7–102.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION AND
SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) OF THIS SECTION, AN EXCISE TAX IS IMPOSED
ON THE GROSS RECEIPTS OF A FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER DERIVED
FROM:
(1) THE RETAIL SALE OF FIREARMS IN THE STATE; AND
(2) IN THE CASE OF A FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER THAT
IS LOCATED OUTSIDE THE STATE, THE RETAIL SALE OF FIREARMS TO RESIDENTS OF
THE STATE.
(B) THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT
APPLY TO THE SALE OF A FIREARM TO:
(1) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY;
(2) THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES;
(3) THE NATIONAL GUARD;
(4) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER;
(5) A RETIRED LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER; OR

HOUSE BILL 387
(6) AN INDIVIDUAL FOR THE EXCLUSIVE PURPOSE OF COMPETITION
SHOOTING OR MATCH SHOOTING.
(C) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE TAX
IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) A RETAIL SALE MADE ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2027 BY A FEDERALLY
LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER THAT IS A LARGE RETAILER; AND
(2) FOR ANY OTHER FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER, A
RETAIL SALE MADE ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2028.
(D) IF THE FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER IS LOCATED OUTSIDE
THE STATE, THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION APPLIES
ONLY IF THE FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER, DURING THE PREVIOUS
CALENDAR YEAR OR THE CURRENT CALENDAR YEAR:
(1) DERIVES GROSS REVENUE FROM THE SALE OF FIREARMS TO
RESIDENTS OF THE STATE THAT EXCEEDS $100,000; OR
(2) SELLS FIREARMS TO RESIDENTS OF THE STATE FOR DELIVERY
INTO THE STATE IN 200 OR MORE SEPARATE TRANSACTIONS.
7.7–103.
THE FIREARM EXCISE TAX RATE IS 11%.
SUBTITLE 2. RETURNS.
7.7–201.
(A) A FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER SHALL COMPLETE, UNDER
OATH, AND FILE WITH THE COMPTROLLER A FIREARM EXCISE TAX RETURN:
(1) ON OR BEFORE THE 25TH DAY OF THE MONTH THAT FOLLOWS THE
MONTH IN WHICH THE PERSON SOLD ANY FIREARMS WITHIN THE BOUNDARIES OF
THE STATE OR, IN THE CASE OF A FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER THAT
IS LOCATED OUTSIDE THE STATE, SOLD FIREARMS TO RESIDENTS OF THE STATE;
AND
(2) IF THE COMPTROLLER SO SPECIFIES, BY REGULATION, ON OTHER
DATES FOR EACH MONTH IN WHICH THE LICENSEE DID NOT SELL ANY FIREARMS IN

HOUSE BILL 387 9
THE STATE OR, IN THE CASE OF A FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER THAT
IS LOCATED OUTSIDE THE STATE, DID NOT SELL ANY FIREARMS TO RESIDENTS OF
THE STATE.
(B) A PERSON REQUIRED TO FILE A RETURN UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL
FILE WITH THE RETURN AN ATTACHMENT THAT STATES ANY INFORMATION THAT
THE COMPTROLLER REQUIRES TO DETERMINE THE GROSS RECEIPTS DERIVED
FROM THE RETAIL SALES OF FIREARMS IN THE STATE OR, IN THE CASE OF A
FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER THAT IS LOCATED OUTSIDE THE STATE,
RETAIL SALES OF FIREARMS TO RESIDENTS OF THE STATE.
7.7–202.
A PERSON REQUIRED TO FILE A RETURN UNDER § 7.7–201 OF THIS SUBTITLE
SHALL MAINTAIN RECORDS OF THE FIREARMS SOLD IN THE STATE OR, IN THE CASE
OF A FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER THAT IS LOCATED OUTSIDE THE
STATE, FIREARMS SOLD TO RESIDENTS OF THE STATE, AND THE BASIS FOR THE
CALCULATION OF THE FIREARM EXCISE TAX OWED.
SUBTITLE 3. TAX PAYMENT.
7.7–301.
(A) EACH PERSON REQUIRED TO FILE A RETURN UNDER § 7.7–201 OF THIS
TITLE SHALL PAY THE FIREARM EXCISE TAX IN THE MANNER THAT THE
COMPTROLLER REQUIRES WITH THE RETURN THAT COVERS THE PERIOD IN WHICH
THE PERSON SOLD FIREARMS IN THE STATE OR, IN THE CASE OF A FEDERALLY
LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER THAT IS LOCATED OUTSIDE THE STATE, SOLD
FIREARMS TO RESIDENTS OF THE STATE.
(B) IF A CORPORATION OTHER THAN A NONSTOCK, NONPROFIT
CORPORATION IS REQUIRED TO PAY THE FIREARM EXCISE TAX, PERSONAL
LIABILITY FOR THE TAX AND INTEREST AND PENALTIES ON THE TAX EXTENDS TO
ANY OFFICER OF THE CORPORATION WHO EXERCISES DIRECT CONTROL OVER ITS
FISCAL MANAGEMENT.
(C) IF A LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY OR LIMITED LIABILITY
PARTNERSHIP, INCLUDING A LIMITED PARTNERSHIP REGISTERED AS A LIMITED
LIABILITY LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, IS REQUIRED TO PAY THE FIREARM EXCISE TAX,
PERSONAL LIABILITY FOR THE TAX AND INTEREST AND PENALTIES ON THE TAX
EXTENDS TO ANY PERSON WHO EXERCISES DIRECT CONTROL OVER THE FISCAL
MANAGEMENT OF THE LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY OR LIMITED LIABILITY
PARTNERSHIP.

HOUSE BILL 387
13–201.
In this subtitle, “tax information” means:
(4) any information contained in:
(xvii) a tobacco tax return; [or]
(xviii) a transportation services assessment return; OR
(XIX) A FIREARM EXCISE TAX RETURN.
13–508.
(a) Within 30 days after the date on which a notice of assessment of the
admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage tax, boxing and wrestling tax,
FIREARM EXCISE TAX, income tax, motor carrier tax, motor fuel tax, public service
company franchise tax, financial institution franchise tax, sales and use tax, or tobacco tax
is mailed, a person or governmental unit against which the assessment is made may submit
to the tax collector:
(1) an application for revision of the assessment; or
(2) except for the public service company franchise tax, if the assessment
is paid, a claim for refund.
(b) If a person or governmental unit fails to submit an application for revision or
claim for refund within the time allowed in subsection (a) of this section, the assessment
becomes final.
(c) The Comptroller or an employee of the Comptroller’s office expressly
designated by the Comptroller promptly:
(1) (i) shall hold an informal hearing on a person’s or governmental
unit’s admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage tax, boxing and wrestling tax,
FIREARM EXCISE TAX, income tax, motor carrier tax, motor fuel tax, sales and use tax, or
tobacco tax application for revision or claim for refund under subsection (a) of this section;
and
(ii) after the hearing:
1. shall act on the application for revision; and
2. may assess any additional tax, penalty, and interest due;
and

HOUSE BILL 387 11
(2) shall mail to the person or governmental unit a notice of final
determination.
13–509.
(a) Notwithstanding a person’s failure to file a timely application for revision or
claim for refund of an assessment of the admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage
tax, boxing and wrestling tax, FIREARM EXCISE TAX, income tax, motor carrier tax, motor
fuel tax, sales and use tax, or tobacco tax under § 13–508(a) of this subtitle, the Comptroller
or the Comptroller’s designee may issue an order decreasing or abating an assessment to
correct an erroneous assessment.
(b) If action is taken under subsection (a) of this section, the order shall state
clearly the reasons for decreasing or abating the assessment.
(c) Any order issued by the Comptroller under subsection (a) of this section shall
be final and not subject to appeal.
(d) The Comptroller’s refusal to enter an order under subsection (a) of this section
shall be final and not subject to appeal.
13–825.
(J) THE COMPTROLLER MAY REQUIRE A PERSON SUBJECT TO THE
FIREARM EXCISE TAX TO POST SECURITY FOR THE FIREARM EXCISE TAX IN THE
AMOUNT THAT THE COMPTROLLER DETERMINES.
13–1001.
(H) A PERSON WHO IS REQUIRED TO FILE A FIREARM EXCISE TAX RETURN
AND WHO WILLFULLY FAILS TO FILE THE RETURN AS REQUIRED UNDER TITLE 7.7
OF THIS ARTICLE IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND, ON CONVICTION, IS SUBJECT
TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS OR
BOTH.
13–1002.
(a) A person who willfully files a false alcoholic beverage tax return OR A FALSE
FIREARM EXCISE TAX RETURN is guilty of perjury and, on conviction, is subject to the
penalty for perjury.
(b) A person, including an officer of a corporation, who willfully files a false digital
advertising gross revenues tax return, a false financial institution franchise tax return, a
false public service company franchise tax return, or a false income tax return with the

HOUSE BILL 387
intent to evade the payment of tax due under this article is guilty of perjury and, on
conviction, is subject to the penalty for perjury.
(c) Subsections (a) and (b) of this section apply to the alcoholic beverage, digital
advertising gross revenues, FIREARM EXCISE, financial institution franchise, public
service company franchise, and income taxes.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2027.